District of Columbia statutes.
10-1001.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1801a
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-238, § 2(a), 51 DCR 10599
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 108, 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 130, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-349, § 3(a), 58 DCR 724
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21,§ 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).